Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1039.
do enact as follows:SB1039,11Section 1. 66.0422 (2) (c) of the statutes is repealed.SB1039,22Section 2. 66.0422 (4) of the statutes is repealed.SB1039,33Section 3. 66.0422 (5) of the statutes is repealed.SB1039,44Section 4. 196.504 (1) (ac) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1039,2,65196.504 (1) (ac) 3. A political subdivision that submits an application in 6partnership with an eligible applicant under subd. 1. or 2.SB1039,57Section 5. 196.504 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1039,2,148196.504 (2) (a) To make broadband expansion grants to eligible applicants for 9the purpose of constructing broadband infrastructure in unserved areas designated 10under par. (e) and to political subdivisions for project planning related to such 11construction, including broadband feasibility reports, or for defraying no more than 1250 percent of the cost of hiring and employing one broadband director. Grants 13awarded under this section shall be paid from the appropriations under ss. 20.155 14(3) (r) and (rm) and 20.866 (2) (z), in the amount allocated under s. 20.866 (2) (z) 5.SB1039,2,1515